Washington statutes.
RCW 36.17.010

Salary full compensation—Compensation denied, when.

The county officers of the counties of this state shall receive a salary for the services required of them by law, or by virtue of their office, which salary shall be full compensation for all services of every kind and description rendered by them. However, if the superior court issues a declaratory judgment under RCW 36.16.125 finding that a county officer has abandoned his or her duties, the county officer may not be paid compensation.

[ 1999 c 71 s 2; 1991 c 363 s 51; 1963 c 4 s 36.17.010. Prior: 1890 p 312 s 32; RRS s 4210.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.